Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-152] Mortgage guarantee agreements.
(a) To induce appropriate officials of any agency or instrumentality of the
United States to commit to insure and to insure mortgages under the provisions
of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, the corporation may enter
into guarantee agreements with those officials whenever:

(1) The purchaser-mortgagor in question is ineligible
for mortgage insurance purposes under the United States Housing Act of 1937, as
amended, because of credit standing, debt obligation, or income
characteristics;

(2) The purchaser-mortgagor in question is a
"displaced person" as defined in chapter 111 and the guarantee
agreement will enable the purchaser-mortgagor to obtain suitable replacement
housing in accordance with chapter 111; or

(3) The corporation finds that the
purchaser-mortgagor would be a satisfactory credit risk with ability to repay
the mortgage loan if the purchaser-mortgagor were to receive budget, debt
management, and related counseling.

(b) Guarantee agreements under subsection (a)
may obligate the corporation to:

(1) Provide or cause to be provided counseling under
subsection (a)(3); and

(2) Indemnify an agency or instrumentality of the
United States for a period not to exceed five years for any loss sustained by
the agency or instrumentality by reason of insurance of a mortgage.

(c) The total of guarantees made pursuant to
this section and guarantees made pursuant to section 201H-151 shall not exceed
$10,000,000. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next